Illinois, session 104th, HB2664.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by changing Section 45 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 708/45)7    Sec. 45. Applicability. 8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 9requirements established under this Act apply to State 10grant-making agencies that make State and federal pass-through 11awards to non-federal entities. These requirements apply to 12all costs related to State and federal pass-through awards. 13The requirements established under this Act do not apply to 14private awards, to allocations of State revenues paid over by 15the Comptroller to units of local government and other taxing 16districts pursuant to the State Revenue Sharing Act from the 17Local Government Distributive Fund or the Personal Property 18Tax Replacement Fund, to allotments of State motor fuel tax 19revenues distributed by the Department of Transportation to 20units of local government pursuant to the Motor Fuel Tax Law 21from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund or the Transportation Renewal 22Fund, or to awards, including capital appropriated funds, made 23by the Department of Transportation to units of local   HB2664- 2 -LRB104 07497 HLH 17541 b1government for the purposes of transportation projects 2utilizing State funds, federal funds, or both State and 3federal funds, or to State and federal pass-through awards to 4municipalities with a population of no greater than 5,000. 5This Act shall recognize that federal and federal pass-through 6awards from the Department of Transportation to units of local 7government are governed by and must comply with federal 8guidelines under 2 CFR Part 200.9    The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 102nd 10General Assembly apply to pending actions as well as actions 11commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 12Act of the 102nd General Assembly. 13    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the use of State 14funds for purposes of federal match or maintenance of effort.15    (b) The terms and conditions of State, federal, and 16pass-through awards apply to subawards and subrecipients 17unless a particular Section of this Act or the terms and 18conditions of the State or federal award specifically indicate 19otherwise. Non-federal entities shall comply with requirements 20of this Act regardless of whether the non-federal entity is a 21recipient or subrecipient of a State or federal pass-through 22award. Pass-through entities shall comply with the 23requirements set forth under the rules adopted under 24subsection (a) of Section 20 of this Act, but not to any 25requirements in this Act directed towards State or federal 26awarding agencies, unless the requirements of the State or   HB2664- 3 -LRB104 07497 HLH 17541 b1federal awards indicate otherwise. 2    When a non-federal entity is awarded a cost-reimbursement 3contract, only 2 CFR 200, Subpart D, Post Federal Award 4Requirements (Subrecipient Monitoring and Management) are 5incorporated by reference into the contract. However, when the 6Cost Accounting Standards are applicable to the contract, they 7take precedence over the requirements of this Act unless they 8are in conflict with Subpart F of 2 CFR 200. In addition, costs 9that are made unallowable under 10 U.S.C. 2324(e) and 41 10U.S.C. 4304(a), as described in the Federal Acquisition 11Regulations, subpart 31.2 and subpart 31.603, are always 12unallowable. For requirements other than those covered in 13Subpart D of 2 CFR 200, Subpart D, Post Federal Award 14Requirements (Subrecipient Monitoring and Management), the 15terms of the contract and the Federal Acquisition Regulations 16apply. 17    With the exception of Subpart F of 2 CFR 200, which is 18required by the Single Audit Act, in any circumstances where 19the provisions of federal statutes or regulations differ from 20the provisions of this Act, the provision of the federal 21statutes or regulations govern. This includes, for agreements 22with Indian tribes, the provisions of the Indian 23Self-Determination and Education and Assistance Act, as 24amended, 25 U.S.C. 450-458ddd-2. 25    (c) State grant-making agencies may apply subparts A 26through E of 2 CFR 200 to for-profit entities, foreign public   HB2664- 4 -LRB104 07497 HLH 17541 b1entities, or foreign organizations, except where the awarding 2agency determines that the application of these subparts would 3be inconsistent with the international obligations of the 4United States or the statute or regulations of a foreign 5government. 6    (d) 2 CFR 200.101 specifies how 2 CFR 200 is applicable to 7different types of awards. The same applicability applies to 8this Act. 9    (e) (Blank).10    (f) For public institutions of higher education, the 11provisions of this Act apply only to awards funded by federal 12pass-through awards from a State agency to public institutions 13of higher education. This Act shall recognize provisions in 2 14CFR 200 as applicable to public institutions of higher 15education, including Appendix III of Part 200 and the cost 16principles under Subpart E. 17    (g) Each grant-making agency shall enhance its processes 18to monitor and address noncompliance with reporting 19requirements and with program performance standards. Where 20applicable, the process may include a corrective action plan. 21The monitoring process shall include a plan for tracking and 22documenting performance-based contracting decisions.23    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 24grants awarded from federal funds received from the federal 25Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund in accordance with 26Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are   HB2664- 5 -LRB104 07497 HLH 17541 b1subject to the provisions of this Act, but only to the extent 2required by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 32021 and other applicable federal law or regulation. 4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-626, eff. 8-27-21; 5102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1092, eff. 6-10-22; 103-616, eff. 67-1-24.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.